Utah statutes.
17-41-503.   Abandonment of a vested mining use.

(1)  A mine operator may abandon some or all of a vested mining use only as provided in this section.

(2)  To abandon some or all of a vested mining use, a mine operator shall record a written declaration of abandonment with the recorder of the county in which the vested mining use being abandoned is located.

(3)  The written declaration of abandonment under Subsection (2) shall specify the vested mining use or the portion of the vested mining use being abandoned.

